Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2178.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-28 of the General Laws entitled "Parking Facilities and
Privileges" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-28-7.4. Motor vehicle plates for persons with disabilities -- Adaptive vehicle license
plate.
(a) Definitions. As used in the section:
(1) "Adaptive vehicle" means a motor vehicle that has been structurally modified or
equipped with specialized equipment (such as ramps, lifts, lowered floors, specialized hand
controls, or restraint systems) to accommodate the transportation needs of an individual with a
significant mobility impairment.
(2) "Adaptive vehicle license plate" means a special registration plate issued under this
section that identifies a vehicle as an adaptive or mobility-modified vehicle.
(3) "Qualified individual" means a person who has a permanent mobility impairment
certified by a licensed physician or a physical therapist, necessitating the use of an adaptive vehicle
for transport.
(b) Eligibility requirements.
(1) Completed application form from the division of motor vehicles.
(2) Medical certification of disability/need for vehicle modification.
(3) Proof of vehicle modification.

(4) Standard registration fees apply.
(c) Privileges and access. Vehicles displaying an adaptive vehicle license plate shall not be
required to display the disability parking privilege placard issued under § 31-28-7:
(d) The division of motor vehicles shall, in addition to the provisions of § 31-28-7, furnish
an "adaptive vehicle license plate" displaying the "International Symbol of Access" for any motor
vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile, commercial vehicle or combination vehicle that
qualifies as an "adaptive vehicle" as defined in this section used exclusively for noncommercial
purposes for a qualified individual.
(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude an eligible individual from obtaining both the
disability parking privilege placard pursuant to § 31-28-7 and the adaptive vehicle license plate
pursuant to this section provided all eligibility requirements are met.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect six (6) months after passage.
========
LC003225/SUB A/2
========
LC003225/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 3